src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
=================================== !
# The Latvian morphophonological/twolc rules file 
=================================== !

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-lav/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

And following triggers to control variation
* **%^RVow:0** rakt:roc
* **%^VowRM:0** vowel removal redzēt:redzu
* **%^VowL:0** vowel lengthening celt:cēlu
* **%^K2C:0** rakt:roc
* **%^JPal:0** sakne:sakņu
* **%^SP3:0** stum%^JPal%^SP3:stumj0 

## VOWELS
**a2o**

* rak%^RVow%^K2C examples:*

* roc00 examples:*

**a2ā**

* dalī%^VowRM%>am examples:*

* dal000ām examples:*

**e2ē**

* cel%^VowL examples:*

* cēl0 examples:*

**u2ū**

* stum%^VowL examples:*

* stūm0 examples:*

**ē20**

**a20**

**ī20**

* dalī%^VowRM%>u examples:*

* dal000u examples:*

## CONSONANTS
**02j**

**%^VowRM:j**

### J_PALATALIZATION
**%^JPal:j**

**s2š THIS CAN BE REMOVED**

**t2š**

**c2č**

**d2ž**

**z2ž**

**n2ņ**

**l2ļ**

* cel%^JPal examples:*

* ceļ0 examples:*

**k2c**

* rak%^RVow%^K2C examples:*

* roc00 examples:*

* rak%^RVow%^K2C examples:*

* rak00 examples:*

**t2s**

**d2s**

**t2z**

**d2z**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-lav/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
